Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 276.255 is amended to read:
276.255. (1)(a) A state agency may[ :]
[(a)] locate, on premises the state agency  owns or controls, devices or facilities that the state
agency installs, or has installed, specifically to deliver electricity to the public for  electric motor
vehicles [ motor vehicles that use electricity for propulsion; and ].
(b) A state agency may contract with  a vendor that will distribute, dispense or otherwise make
available electricity from devices or facilities described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may install or  have installed devices
or facilities described in subsection (1)(a) of this section [ at not more  than 10 locations during a
biennium] in as many locations as are sufficient to meet demand for the devices or facilities .
[(b) A state agency other than the department may install or have installed devices or facilities
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section at not more than five locations during a biennium. ]
(b) The department by  rule shall establish criteria by means of which a state agency shall
determine an appropriate number of locations at which the  state agency may install or have
installed devices or facilities described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(c) Notwithstanding [ paragraphs (a) and ] paragraph (b) of this subsection, a state agency may
install or have installed devices or facilities described in subsection (1)(a) of this  section at more
than the number of locations [ specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of  this subsection ] determined in
accordance with the department’s rule  if the state agency obtains  a grant to support the instal-
lations at each additional location.
(3) A state agency that contracts with a vendor under subsection (1) (b) of this section shall re-
quire in the contract that the vendor:
(a) Indemnify the state  agency against any claim related to or arising out of the vendor’s oper-
ations on premises that the state agency owns or controls; and
(b) Obtain a policy of liability insurance in an amount  sufficient to pay foreseeable claims that
relate to or arise out of the vendor’s operations, name the  state agency as an insured party in the
policy and maintain coverage under the policy during the term of the contract and for two  years
after the contract term expires.
Enrolled House Bill 4022 (HB 4022-A) Page 1
(4) A state agency may by order establish and adjust prices for using devices or facilities de-
scribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section that are located on premises the  state agency owns or
controls. The state agency shall set the price for  using the devices or facilities at a level that [ does
not]:
[(a) Subsidize the operations of a private entity or the cost of electricity to the public; or ]
[(b) Substantially exceed the costs to the state agency of making the  electricity available to the
public.]
(a) Recovers to the maximum extent practicable the cost of operating  and administering
the devices or facilities described in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Does not exceed 110 percent of  the average market price for delivering electricity to
the public for the purpose described in subsection (1)(a) of this section in the county in which
the device or facility is located.
(5) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a state agency shall  set a uniform price for
delivering electricity  at devices and facilities located on premises that the state agency owns
or controls. The state agency  shall use criteria and a methodology that the department
specifies for calculating the uniform price.
(6) The department shall report to the Legislative Assembly in  the manner provided by
ORS 192.245 not later than February 1, 2019, February  1, 2021, and February 1, 2023, con-
cerning state agency implementation of the  authority granted in this section. Each report
must, as of the date of the report:
(a) List the  number of devices or facilities for delivering electricity to the public for
electric motor  vehicles that state agencies installed or had installed in the previous two
years and the total  number of installations that have occurred since the effective date of this
2018 Act;
(b) List the number of devices or facilities that state agencies  have planned for installa-
tion in the next two years;
(c) List the cost to the state agency of each installation and calculate:
(A) An average cost for installations that state agencies have completed or had com-
pleted; and
(B) An overall trend line for costs that state agencies have incurred;
(d) Specify the current uniform price that  each state agency charges under subsection
(5) of this section and any changes in the uniform price that occurred in the  previous two
years;
(e) Specify for each state agency an  average rate of utilization for all of the devices or
facilities located on premises that the state agency owns or controls, calculated  as the ratio
of the time each day during which  a person is actually using the devices or facilities and the
time each day in which the devices and facilities are available for use; and
(f) Specify whether and to what extent using electric motor vehicles and devices or  fa-
cilities located on premises that state agencies own or control to provide  electricity for state
agency electric motor vehicles results in a cost savings to the state  agency in comparison
to using motor vehicles that do not use electricity for propulsion.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 276.255 by section 1 of this 2018  Act apply to con-
tracts for distributing, dispensing or making available electricity to the public  for electric
motor vehicles into which a state agency enters or that  the state agency renews on or after
the effective date of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4022 (HB 4022-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 15, 2018
Repassed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4022 (HB 4022-A) Page 3